New York, session 2025-2026, S3100.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (r) of subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the 2 social services law, as added by section 32 of part C of chapter 58 of 3 the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 4 (r) asthma self-management training services for persons or parents of 5 persons diagnosed with asthma including information on proper use of 6 devices such as spacers, valved holding chambers and masks, and triggers 7 in the environment which should be avoided or managed, when such 8 services are ordered by a physician, registered physician's assistant, 9 registered nurse practitioner, or licensed midwife and provided by a 10 licensed, registered, or certified health care professional, as deter- 11 mined by the commissioner of health, who is certified as an asthma 12 educator by the National Asthma Educator Certification Board, or a 13 successor national certification board; provided, however, that the 14 provisions of this paragraph shall not take effect unless all necessary 15 approvals under federal law and regulation have been obtained to receive 16 federal financial participation in the costs of health care services 17 provided pursuant to this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 18 construed to modify any licensure, certification or scope of practice 19 provision under title eight of the education law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04803-02-6 S. 3100--A 2 1 § 2. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 41 of subsection (i) of section 2 3216 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 504 of the laws of 2025, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (B) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 5 maintenance inhaler [that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 6 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement]. Coverage for 7 children under nineteen years of age shall also include a second rescue 8 and maintenance inhaler, along with any medically necessary devices. 9 Coverage shall also include any device deemed medically necessary for 10 assisting in the administration of such medications, including but not 11 limited to: spacers, valved holding chambers, or masks and other similar 12 devices. None of these coverage requirements shall be subject to a 13 deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing require- 14 ment. 15 § 3. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 23 of subsection (l) of section 16 3221 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 504 of the laws of 2025, 17 is amended to read as follows: 18 (B) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 19 maintenance inhaler [that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 20 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement]. Coverage for 21 children under nineteen years of age shall also include a second rescue 22 and maintenance inhaler, along with any medically necessary devices. 23 Coverage shall also include any device deemed medically necessary for 24 assisting in the administration of such medications, including but not 25 limited to: spacers, valved holding chambers, or masks and other similar 26 devices. None of these coverage requirements shall be subject to a 27 deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing require- 28 ment. 29 § 4. Paragraph 2 of subsection (ww) of section 4303 of the insurance 30 law, as added by chapter 504 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 (2) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form of 33 maintenance inhaler [that shall not be subject to a deductible, copay- 34 ment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement]. Coverage for 35 children under nineteen years of age shall also include a second rescue 36 and maintenance inhaler, along with any medically necessary devices. 37 Coverage shall also include any device deemed medically necessary for 38 assisting in the administration of such medications, including but not 39 limited to: spacers, valved holding chambers, or masks and other similar 40 devices. None of these coverage requirements shall be subject to a 41 deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing require- 42 ment. 43 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 44 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to all 45 policies issued, renewed, altered or modified on or after such date; 46 provided, however, that if chapter 504 of the laws of 2025 shall not 47 have taken effect on or before such date then sections two, three and 48 four of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 49 manner as such chapter of the laws of 2025 takes effect.